Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20178-166
Banks; reports to department; form; number required; verification; waiver.

(1) Every bank shall make to the department not less than two reports during each year according to the form which may be prescribed by the department, which report shall be certified as correct, in the manner prescribed by the department, by the president, vice president, cashier, or assistant cashier and in addition by two members of the board of directors.

(2) The director may waive the requirements of this section if a bank files its reports electronically with the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Federal Reserve Board, or an electronic collection agent of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Federal Reserve Board.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 17, p. 75;

R.S.1913, § 296;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 17, p. 692;

C.S.1922, § 7998;

C.S.1929, § 8-129;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 19, p. 144;

Laws 1941, c. 10, § 1, p. 80;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-129;

R.S.1943, § 8-131;

Laws 1957, c. 11, § 1, p. 134;

Laws 1961, c. 15, § 2, p. 111;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-131;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 66, p. 161;

Laws 1997, LB 137, § 7;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 63.